Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
Voluntary Termination

625.040.
Petition.

A petition for the voluntary termination of parental rights shall be entitled “In the interest of..., a child.” The petition may be filed by a parent or counsel when the appearance-waiver and consent-to-adopt forms are signed by the parent, counsel, and cabinet representative under the conditions described in KRS 625.041(3) and (4).

The petition for the voluntary termination of parental rights shall be filed in the Circuit Court of the judicial circuit where the petitioner or child resides or in the Circuit Court in the county in which juvenile court actions, if any, concerning the child have commenced, and shall be verified and contain the following:

Name and place of residence of each petitioner;

Name, sex, date of birth, and place of residence of the child;

Name and relationship of each petitioner to the child;

A concise statement of the factual basis for the termination of parental rights;

Name and address of the person or of the cabinet or authorized agency to which parental rights are sought to be transferred; and

A statement that the person, cabinet, or authorized agency to whom custody is to be given has facilities available, is willing to receive the custody of the child, and the person, if not excepted by KRS 199.470(4), has applied for the written permission of the secretary or the secretary’s designee for the child’s placement. This provision shall not affect the right of a court to grant temporary custody under KRS

199.473

.

No petition may be filed under this chapter prior to three (3) days after the birth of the child.

Any petition filed pursuant to this section shall be fully adjudicated and a final judgment shall be entered by the court within six (6) months of the filing of the petition.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 100, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 63, effective April 10, 1988; 1994, ch. 242, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 57, § 11, effective March 17, 1998; 2018 ch. 159, § 38, effective July 14, 2018.

625.0405.
Appointment of attorney to represent indigent parent for termination of rights for purpose of adoption — Expenses paid by prospective adoptive parents to be submitted to court — Penalty.

A parent desiring the termination of his or her parental rights and a transfer of the parental rights to a person, persons, the cabinet, or a child-placing agency licensed by the cabinet for the purpose of adoption may prior to or upon the filing of the petition request the Circuit Court to appoint an attorney to represent the parent and provide legal representation in the termination action. If the court determines pursuant to KRS Chapter 31 that the requesting parent is indigent, the court shall appoint an attorney (within forty-eight (48) hours) to represent the indigent parent. The attorney for the indigent parent shall receive a fee to be fixed by the court, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) and assessed as costs, and the court may order the costs to be paid by the proposed adoptive parent, parents, or agency before the entry of a judgment of termination, except the attorney’s fee shall be paid by the Finance and Administration Cabinet if termination is not granted, or if custody of the child is placed with the cabinet.

In every voluntary termination proceeding, the expenses paid, including but not limited to any fees for legal services, placement services, and expenses of the biological parent or parents, by the prospective adoptive parent for any purpose related to a termination of parental rights shall be submitted to the court, supported by an affidavit, setting forth in detail a listing of the expenses for the court’s approval or modification.

In the event the court modifies the expense request as it relates to legal fees and legal expenses only, the attorney for the prospective adoptive parents shall not have any claim against the prospective adoptive parents for the amount not approved.

Any person who violates subsection (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 242, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 57, § 9, effective March 17, 1998.

625.0407.
Attorney not to represent both biological and adoptive parents — Penalty.

In a voluntary termination proceeding, an attorney shall not represent both the biological parents and the prospective adoptive parents.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 242, § 19, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Petition for Voluntary Termination of Parental Rights of Natural Mother, Form 266.02.

625.041.
Party to action — Guardian ad litem to be appointed.

The parties to an action for voluntary termination of parental rights shall be the parent seeking termination, whose presence is not required if represented by counsel for the parent when an appearance-waiver and consent-to-adopt form is filed with the court, but the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the best interest of the child.

The guardian ad litem shall be paid a fee to be fixed by the court, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), to be paid by the petitioner, except if the Cabinet for Health and Family Services receives custody of the child, the guardian ad litem shall be paid by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The parent may sign an appearance-waiver and consent-to-adopt form when the parent chooses not to attend a voluntary termination of parental rights proceedings. This form, prescribed by the Administrative Office of the Courts, shall:

Contain a statement of acknowledgment and agreement, regarding the appearance at the proceeding, signed by the parent, counsel for the parent, and the cabinet. If the parent is a minor, the form shall also be signed by the guardian of the minor parent;

Contain the parent’s notarized signature;

Contain any address to which the parent requests the final judgment be served.

If a joint petition is filed, counsel shall be designated as attorney for both parties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 64, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 57, § 12, effective March 17, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 620, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 669, effective June 20, 2005.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 266.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Petition of Minor by Guardian to Voluntarily Terminate Parental Rights, Form 264.04.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order for Fees in Termination of Parental Rights Case, Form 266.22.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.2.

625.042.
Conduct of hearings.

Within three (3) days after a petition for the voluntary termination of parental rights is filed, the Circuit Court shall set a date for a hearing which shall not be more than thirty (30) calendar days after the petition is filed. In any case in which the child’s permanent custody is proposed to be transferred to an individual not excepted by KRS 199.470(4), a final order of termination shall be entered only if the proposed custodian has received the written approval of the secretary or the secretary’s designee for the child’s placement as required by KRS

199.473

. The secretary or the secretary’s designee shall provide written approval or disapproval, if required by this subsection, within thirty (30) days after the request is made.

The Circuit Court shall require notice to be served upon the local representative of the cabinet in any case in which a statement from the cabinet of willingness to accept custody of the child has not been filed with the petition, or custody of the child is to be placed with an individual unless the placement has been approved by the cabinet. It shall not be necessary to serve notice upon the cabinet if custody of the child is to be placed with the cabinet or with a child-placing agency.

Proceedings under this chapter shall be completed as soon as practicable but shall not exceed six (6) months. All hearings shall be held before the Circuit Court privately for the purpose of determining the facts.

An official stenographic or mechanical record shall be made of the proceedings and retained for a period of five (5) years.

The best interests of the child shall be considered paramount, including but not limited to matters relating to child support.

At the time of the hearing, the Circuit Court, after full and complete inquiry, shall determine whether each petitioner is fully aware of the purpose of the proceedings and the consequences of the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 65, effective April 10, 1988; 1994, ch. 242, § 15, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 57, § 10, effective March 17, 1998; 2018 ch. 159, § 39, effective July 14, 2018.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Wiederstein, Closed Courtrooms and the Public’s Right of Access, Vol. 67, No. 4, July 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 15.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 266.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Report of Guardian ad Litem for Petitioner in Termination of Parental Rights--Petitioner Incarcerated, Form 266.14.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.2.

625.043.
Termination orders.

If the Circuit Court determines that parental rights are to be voluntarily terminated in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, it shall make an order terminating all parental rights and obligations of the parent and releasing the child from all legal obligations to the parent and vesting care and custody of the child in the person, agency, or cabinet the court believes is best qualified to receive custody.

Upon consent by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the child may be declared a ward of the state and custody vested in the cabinet or in any child-placing agency or child-caring facility licensed by the cabinet or in another person if all persons with parental rights to the child under the law have had their rights terminated voluntarily or involuntarily. If the other person is not excepted by KRS 199.470(4), a grant of permanent custody shall be made only if the proposed custodian has received the written approval of the secretary or the secretary’s designee for the child’s placement.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 66, effective April 10, 1988; 1994, ch. 242, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 621, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 670, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 159, § 40, effective July 14, 2018.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order and Judgment Voluntarily (Mother) Termination of Parental Rights and Involuntary Termination (Absent Father) of Parental Rights, Form 266.19.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 266.00.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.2.

625.044.
Child’s right to inherit following termination.

Following the entry of an order voluntarily terminating parental rights in a child, the child shall retain the right to inherit from his parent under the laws of descent and distribution until the child is adopted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 67, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 266.00.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.2.

625.045.
Confidentiality and sealing of files and records.

Any order resulting from the voluntary termination of parental rights of any person under the provisions of this chapter, including the caption of the order, shall contain only the name of the child, without any reference to the names of the parents whose rights have been terminated. Such order shall be duly recorded in the order book of the Circuit Court and a certified copy of the order given to the petitioner and to the cabinet upon request. Such order may contain a statement of authority to place the child for adoption.

The files and records of the Circuit Court, excluding the name or other identifying information of a prospective adoptive parent, during proceedings for voluntary termination of parental rights shall not be open to inspection by persons other than parties to such proceedings, their attorneys, and representatives of the cabinet, except under order of the court expressly permitting inspection. Upon the entry of the final order in the case, the clerk shall place all papers and records in the case in a suitable envelope which shall be sealed and shall not be open for inspection by any person other than representatives of the cabinet without a written order of the court or as authorized by the provisions of KRS Chapter 199.

No person having charge of any voluntary termination records shall disclose the names of any parties appearing in such records or furnish any copy of any such records, except upon order of the court which entered the judgment of termination; however, facts necessary in order to secure a court order for a copy of the termination order to be used in an adoption proceeding may be disclosed. The clerk of the Circuit Court shall set up a separate docket and order book for termination cases and these files and records shall be kept locked.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 68, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Wiederstein, Closed Courtrooms and the Public’s Right of Access, Vol. 67, No. 4, July 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 15.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 266.00.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.2.

625.046.
Effect of termination order.

Any order for the voluntary termination of parental rights shall be conclusive and binding on all parties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 69, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.2.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Adoption and Termination of Parental Rights, Form 3.5.